Georgia, session 2025_26, HB640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to amend, consolidate, create, revise, and supersede the several Acts incorporating
the City of Alpharetta, approved April 9, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 4609), as amended, is
amended by revising Section 5.16 as follows:
"SECTION 5.16.
Election by majority.
The person receiving a majority of the votes cast for any city office shall be elected. In
instances where no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast, a runoff between the
H. B. 640
- 1 -

LC 44 2946/AP
candidates receiving the two highest numbers of votes shall be held, and the person
receiving a majority of the votes cast in the run-off election shall be elected."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 640
- 2 -